California, session 20252026, AB560.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 56362 of the Education Code is amended to read:56362. (a) The resource specialist program shall provide, but not be limited to, all of the following:(1) Provision for a resource specialist or specialists who shall provide instruction and services for those pupils whose needs have been identified in an individualized education program developed by the individualized education program team and who are assigned to regular classroom teachers for a majority of a schoolday.(2) Provision of information and assistance to individuals with exceptional needs and their parents.(3) Provision of consultation, resource information, and material regarding individuals with exceptional needs to their parents and to regular staff members.(4) Coordination of special education services with the regular school programs for each individual with exceptional needs enrolled in the resource specialist program.(5) Monitoring of pupil progress on a regular basis, participation in the review and revision of individualized education programs, as appropriate, and referral of pupils who do not demonstrate appropriate progress to the individualized education program team.(6) Emphasis at the secondary school level on academic achievement, career and vocational development, and preparation for adult life.(b) The resource specialist program shall be under the direction of a resource specialist who is a credentialed special education teacher, or who has a clinical services credential with a special class authorization, who has had three or more years of teaching experience, including both regular and special education teaching experience, as defined by rules and regulations of the Commission on Teacher Credentialing, and who has demonstrated the competencies for a resource specialist, as established by the Commission on Teacher Credentialing.(c) Caseloads for resource specialists shall be stated in the local policies developed pursuant to Section 56195.8 and in accordance with regulations established by the board. A resource specialist shall not have a caseload that exceeds 28 pupils.(d) Resource specialists shall not simultaneously be assigned to serve as resource specialists and to teach regular classes.(e) Resource specialists shall not enroll a pupil for a majority of a schoolday without approval by the pupil’s individualized education program team.(f) At least 80 percent of the resource specialists within a local plan shall be provided with an instructional aide.(g) Local educational agencies shall take all reasonable steps to distribute the workload associated with initial assessments across all resource specialists employed by the local educational agency in an equal manner, unless otherwise collectively bargained.SEC. 2. Section 56364.3 is added to the Education Code, to read:56364.3. (a) On or before July 1, 2027, the Superintendent shall recommend a maximum adult-to-pupil staffing ratio for special classes authorized pursuant to Section 56364.2 for pupils 3 to 22 years of age, inclusive, and post the recommendation on the department’s internet website.(b) In making the recommendation required pursuant to subdivision (a), the Superintendent shall do all of the following:(1) (A) Consult with all of the following individuals:(i) Current credentialed education specialists teaching in a special class setting. A majority of the individuals consulted pursuant to this paragraph shall meet this requirement.(ii) Administrators and chief business officials serving at schoolsites, school districts, county offices of education, and special education local plan areas.(iii) Paraprofessionals serving in special class settings.(iv) Parents of pupils with exceptional needs who are served in special class settings.(B) The individuals consulted pursuant to subparagraph (A) shall represent the state’s geographic diversity, including, but not limited to, rural, urban, and high-need regions.(2) Consult with researchers and representatives with expertise in inclusive practices and advocates focused on equity and disability rights.(3) Consider all of the following:(A) The varying needs of pupils, including pupils with mild to moderate support needs and pupils with extensive support needs.(B) The varying needs of pupils by age.(C) The types of school settings, including preschools, elementary schools, secondary schools, and nonpublic schools.(D) Existing practices among local educational agencies.(E) Other states’ adult-to-pupil ratios for special classes.(F) Other constraints, including, but not limited to, workforce and facility needs, and conditions in small and rural local educational agencies.(G) The effects on the education of pupils with disabilities in the least restrictive environment, as required by the federal Individuals with Disabilities Education Act (20 U.S.C. Sec. 1400 et seq.).(H) Determining appropriate staffing ratios to enhance pupil outcomes in accordance with the principles of the federal Individuals with Disabilities Education Act (20 U.S.C. Sec. 1400 et seq.) and state law.(I) The supports needed for general education and special education educators to succeed in implementing inclusive models.(c) Notwithstanding Section 10231.5 of the Government Code, the Superintendent shall report their recommendations to the appropriate policy and fiscal committees of the Legislature and the state board on or before April 1, 2027, consistent with the requirements of Section 9795 of the Government Code.SEC. 3. If the Commission on State Mandates determines that this act contains costs mandated by the state, reimbursement to local agencies and school districts for those costs shall be made pursuant to Part 7 (commencing with Section 17500) of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Government Code.